Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.020

Petition—Requisites.

The petition for disincorporation must be signed by a majority of the registered voters thereof and filed with the city or town council.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.07.020. Prior: 1897 c 69 s 2, part; RRS s 8915, part.]